South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3072.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 17-5-130(A)(1) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (1) A coroner in this State shall have all of the following qualifications, the person shall: (a) be a citizen of the United States; (b) be a resident of the county in which the person seeks the office of coroner for at least one year before qualifying for the election toat the times he files for the office; (c) be a registered voter; (d) have attained the age of twenty-one years before the date of qualifying for election to the office; (e) have obtained a high school diploma or its recognized equivalent by the State Department of Education; and (f) have not been convicted of a felony offense or an offense involving moral turpitude contrary to the laws of this State, another state, or the United States. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----